Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Chapter 6 State Miner's Hospital Board

§ 30-6-101.
State miner's hospital board.

The state miner’s hospital board is created consisting of the following members:

One (1) member resident of Sweetwater County appointed by a majority vote of the county commissioners. In making this appointment the county commissioners shall appoint a member of the Sweetwater County Memorial Hospital Board if a member of that board is willing and able to serve;

Seven (7) members representing miners, including at least one (1) member from Sweetwater county and at least one (1) member from Campbell county all appointed by the governor; and

One (1) member resident of Campbell County appointed by a majority vote of the county commissioners. In making this appointment the county commissioners shall appoint a member of the Campbell County Memorial Hospital Board if a member of that board is willing and able to serve.

Except for initial terms pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, terms of members shall be for four (4) years. Any vacancy shall be filled by the designated appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term within not more than thirty (30) days following the date on which the vacancy occurred. Any voting member may serve not more than two (2) consecutive terms. However, a member may be reappointed after a two (2) year absence. Each member shall serve until his successor is appointed and has been qualified. The governor may remove any member appointed by him pursuant to W.S.

9-1-202

.

For the initial board, two (2) members appointed by the governor shall serve a term of four (4) years and two (2) members appointed by the governor shall serve a term of two (2) years. Two (2) members appointed from the Sweetwater County Memorial Hospital Board shall serve a term of four (4) years and two (2) members shall serve a term of two (2) years. The member appointed from the Campbell County Memorial Hospital Board shall serve a term of four (4) years.

The members shall receive per diem and travel expenses in the same manner and amount as authorized under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for state employees when on or conducting official business.

The board shall meet not less than two (2) times each year. At the initial meeting of the board, the board shall elect a chairman. The board is authorized to hire an executive director and up to two (2) additional full-time permanent employees to provide administrative support to the board, the legislative oversight committee and the miner’s hospital. The executive director and additional employees shall be located in Sweetwater county unless otherwise directed by the board.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 185, § 1; 2008, ch. 40, § 1; 2014 ch. 6, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “One (1) member” for “Four (4) members” in (a)(i); and in (a)(ii), substituted “Seven (7)” for “Four (4)” at the beginning, substituted “including at least one (1) member” for “two (2) members,” and substituted “and at least one (1) member” for “and two (2) members.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014,
in (a)(i), substituted “resident of Sweetwater County”
for “of the Sweetwater County Memorial Hospital Board,”
divided the former first sentence into the first and second sentences
by substituting “In making this appointment” for “or,”
substituted “member of the” for “designee if
a,” and substituted “if a member of that board is willing
and able to serve” for “if a member cannot serve”;
and in (a)(iii), substituted “resident of Campbell County”
for “of the Campbell County Memorial Hospital Board,”
divided the former first sentence into the first and second sentences
by substituting “In making this appointment” for “or,”
substituted “member of the” for “designee if
the a,” and substituted “if a member of that board is
willing and able to serve” for “member cannot serve.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (e) substituted “up to two (2) additional full-time permanent employees” for “secretary” in the first sentence and “additional employees” for “the secretary” in the last sentence.

Editor's notes.—

Laws 2008, ch. 40, § 2, provides: “The terms of the three (3) members of the state miner's hospital board appointed by the Sweetwater County Memorial Hospital Board with terms expiring prior to 2012 shall expire as of the effective date of this act.
As of the effective date of this act the governor shall appoint three (3) new members representing miners and the terms of those members shall begin at that time.”

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353 (10th Cir. 2002).

§ 30-6-102.
Account created; expenditures; report.

There is created the miner’s hospital board account. Not later than July 1, 2001, the state treasurer shall credit to the account six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000.00) from interest accrued within the miner’s hospital account within the permanent land income fund created by W.S. 9-4-310(c)(v). The amount available for appropriation annually to the miner’s hospital board account shall not exceed an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the balance of both the miner’s hospital account within the permanent land fund created by W.S. 9-4-310(a)(ix) and the miner’s hospital income account within the permanent land income fund created by W.S. 9-4-310(c)(v). No appropriation shall be made from either the miner’s hospital account within the permanent land fund created by W.S. 9-4-310(a)(ix) or the miner’s hospital income account within the permanent land fund created by W.S. 9-4-310(c)(v) to another account other than the miner’s hospital board account created by this subsection. The money in the account shall be used to provide for the expenses of the board and its staff, as well as to implement the recommendations of the board.

The board shall:

Serve disabled or incapacitated miners in this state with emphasis on pulmonary/respiratory, hearing loss, cardiac and musculoskeletal conditions of miners due to labor in the mining industry;

Develop a plan to meet the miner’s health care needs in this state. In recommending plans for meeting the miner’s health care needs in this state, the board shall base its initial recommendations upon the report entitled “The Health Care Needs Assessment of Wyoming Miners,” dated November 13, 2000 prepared by BBC Research and Consulting specifically dealing with both the medical and geographic findings, as well as phase II of the plan identifying alternative programs to address the needs identified in the plan. The plan shall be based upon the anticipated revenue to the account created by subsection (a) of this section;

Promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this act including eligibility for services for miners, establish administrative procedures for auditing and accountability;

Have authority to contract with service providers for the purposes of this act.

Each biennium the board shall recommend expenditures of any monies in the account created by subsection (a) of this section for purposes of addressing miner’s health issues based upon the plan prepared by the board under subsection (b) of this section. The recommendations shall be reviewed by the joint appropriations interim committee and any recommendations from the committee shall be included in the budget for appropriation. Any recommendations shall require legislative appropriation to become effective.

Not later than December 1 of each year, the board shall report to the governor and the joint appropriations interim committee on the activities of the board including any recommendations made for expenditure of monies from the account created by subsection (a) of this section to address miner’s health issues in this state.

Payment made by the board from the account shall be payment of last resort and the board shall reduce any benefit which would be provided under this section by all other public and private sources which are available to the miner for the disability or condition.

As used in this section and W.S.

30-6-104

:

“Mine” means an area of land from which minerals, coal or other geological materials are extracted and processed in nonliquid form or, if in liquid form, through an in situ leach process;

“Miner” means a current resident of Wyoming who has worked in a mine in this state or a contiguous state who is or was employed at a mine or at a processing or conversion facility contiguous to the mine and dependent upon the output of that mine as feedstock. “Miner” shall include persons providing labor or services at the mine or qualifying processing or conversion facility on a continuing and regular basis whether employed by the mine owner or operator or hired on a contract basis. “Miner” shall not include persons providing labor or services at the mine or qualifying processing or conversion facility on an occasional or incidental basis as defined by board rule;

“Mining” means coal mining, metal ore mining and nonmetallic mineral mining and quarrying. “Mining” includes coal, trona, bentonite, gypsum, sand and gravel and other stone and uranium mining;

“Domicile” means that place where a person has his true, fixed and permanent home to which whenever the person is temporarily absent the person has the intention of returning. To prove domicile in Wyoming under this act a person shall be able to establish that he:

Physically resides in Wyoming;

Has made his permanent home in Wyoming;

Is not residing in Wyoming for a special or temporary purpose; and

Has abandoned his domicile in all other states, territories or countries.

“Resident” means a United States citizen or legal alien who meets the requirements specified in W.S.

30-6-104

(a)(i) through (iv).

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 185, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 6, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (c), deleted “after consultation with the legislative oversight committee created pursuant to W.S.

30-6-103

”; in (d) deleted “the legislative oversight committee created pursuant to W.S.

30-6-103

”; added (e); redesignated former (e) as (f); in the introductory language of (f), added “and W.S. 30-601-4”; in (f)(i), substituted “‘Mine’” for “‘Coal or other mine’”, added “coal or other geological materials”; in the first sentence of (f)(ii), adding “current”, deleted “coal or other”, in the second sentence of (f)(ii), substituted “persons providing labor or services at” for “plant if the operator of”, substituted “qualifying processing or conversion facility” for “plant if the operator works”, added “whether employed by the mine owner or operator or hired on a contract basis”, added the third sentence; and added (f)(iv) and (f)(v).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “within the special revenue fund” in the first sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (f)(v), substituted “specified in W.S.

30-6-104

(a)(i) through (iv)” for “specified in W.S.

30-6-104

.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to Laws 2001, ch. 185, § 1, compiled (as amended) as §§

30-6-101

through

30-6-103

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act”.

§ 30-6-103.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 185, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 6, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 30-6-104.
Requirements for obtaining benefits.

To obtain benefits from the account, a person shall:

Be domiciled in Wyoming on the date of application for a benefit;

Make no claim of residency in any other state, territory or country for any other purpose at the time of application for a benefit or at any time during receipt of a benefit;

Maintain his domicile in Wyoming at the time of receipt of the benefit;

Provide to the board a copy of his current Wyoming driver’s license, identification card issued by the Wyoming department of transportation, or other identification satisfactory to establish his identity as specified in board rule;

Have not fewer than ten (10) years of employment as a miner.

History.

2014 ch. 6, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 52, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 52, § 2, provides: “The employment requirement in
W.S. 30-6-104(a)(v) as created in this act shall not apply to those persons registered to receive benefits before July 1, 2018.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 6, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.